Washington statutes.
RCW 15.65.420

Use of moneys collected—Departmental expenses.

Moneys collected by the director or his or her designee pursuant to any marketing order or agreement from any assessment or as an advance deposit thereon, shall be used by the director or his or her designee only for the purpose of paying for expenses and costs arising in connection with the formulation, issuance, administration, and enforcement of such order or agreement and carrying out its provisions together with a proportionate share of the overhead expenses of the department attributable to its performance of its duties under this chapter with respect to such marketing order or agreement.

[ 2010 c 8 s 6083; 1961 c 256 s 42.]